sk-SK: Označenie veľkosti: Extra veľké; Extra malé; Veľké; Stredné; Malé; Iné
zh-CN: 尺寸标识: 加大号; 加小号; 大号; 中号; 小号; 其他
pl: Oznaczenie rozmiaru: Bardzo duży; Bardzo mały; Duży; Średni; Mały; Inne
nb: Størrelsesbetegnelse: Ekstra stor; Ekstra liten; Stor; Medium; Liten; Annet
de: Größenbezeichnung: Extra groß; Extra klein; Groß; Mittel; Klein; Andere
ja: サイズ表記: エクストララージ; エクストラスモール; ラージ; ミディアム; スモール; その他
bg-BG: Обозначение на размера: Много голям; Много малък; Голям; Среден; Малък; Друг
fi: Kokomääritys: Erittäin suuri; Erittäin pieni; Suuri; Keskikoko; Pieni; Muu
ko: 사이즈 표기: 엑스트라 라지; 엑스트라 스몰; 라지; 미디엄; 스몰; 기타
da: Størrelsesbetegnelse: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Andet
th: การกำหนดขนาด: ใหญ่พิเศษ; เล็กพิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Desemnare a mărimii: Foarte mare; Foarte mică; Mare; Medie; Mică; Alta
fr: Désignation de la taille: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Autre
hr-HR: Oznaka veličine: Ekstra velika; Ekstra mala; Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
hu: Méretjelölés: Extra nagy; Extra kicsi; Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
it: Designazione della taglia: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Altro
es: Designación de talla: Extra grande; Extra pequeño; Grande; Mediano; Pequeño; Otro
zh-TW: 尺寸標示: 特大; 特小; 大; 中; 小; 其他
ru: Обозначение размера: Очень большой; Очень маленький; Большой; Средний; Маленький; Другое
el: Χαρακτηρισμός μεγέθους: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oznaka velikosti: Zelo veliko; Zelo majhno; Veliko; Srednje; Majhno; Drugo
pt-BR: Designação de tamanho: Extragrande; Extrapequeno; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
cs: Označení velikosti: Extra velké; Extra malé; Velké; Střední; Malé; Jiné
pt-PT: Designação do tamanho: Extra grande; Extra pequeno; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
tr: Beden tanımı: Ekstra büyük; Ekstra küçük; Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
nl: Maataanduiding: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Overig
vi: Chỉ định kích thước: Cực lớn; Cực nhỏ; Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Khác
sv: Storleksbeteckning: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Övrigt
en: Size designation: Extra large; Extra small; Large; Medium; Small; Other
lt-LT: Dydžio žymėjimas: Ypač didelis; Ypač mažas; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Kita